Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 30 State Inmate Industries and Labor
12-30-304. Products — Purchase by state institutions.

It shall be the duty of the various state institutions to purchase, as far as possible, products grown or produced by the state upon its Division of Correction and other farms, giving the state preference wherever possible.

Sales shall be made at prevailing market prices and all proceeds thereof shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State to the credit of the Division of Correction Farm Fund.

However, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, by proper bookkeeping entries, may charge the institution so purchasing and credit the Division of Correction account with such amount.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section may be affected by the Prison-Made Goods Act of 1967, §12-30-201 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a), (b)(1), and (b)(2); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(2).

The director shall give a bond to be approved by the board as the board may require for the performance of the duties imposed under this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The operation of subsection (c) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to §21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See §21-2-703.

This section may be affected by the Prison-Made Goods Act of 1967, §12-30-201 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and (c).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §12-30-307, concerning payment for food used by Department of Corrections, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 648, § 24.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”, “Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account” for “Department of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account”, “Division of Correction Farm Fund” for “Department of Correction Farm Fund”, and “division” for “department”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

Cross References. State General Government Fund, §19-5-302.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment by No. 294 deleted (b)(2).

The 2013 amendment by No. 295 substituted “inmates” for “convicts” in (b)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1277 deleted the (b)(1) designation; in (b), deleted “The board” from the beginning, inserted “the board” preceding “may rent”, and substituted “inmates” for “convicts”; and deleted (b)(2).

Cross References. Disabled convicts, physician's duties, §12-29-403.

Physical examinations, assignment to labor, §12-29-402.

Effective Dates. Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 46: Mar. 1, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order better to effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crime and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to establish a Department of Correction to effectuate such rehabilitation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after March 1, 1968.”

Acts 1971, No. 465, § 3: Mar. 31, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that work-release programs would be of great value, and finds that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to effectuate such programs; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 948, § 27: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1977 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1977 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1981, No. 58, § 7: approved Feb. 12, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order to better effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crimes and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to facilitate these reforms. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1983, No. 309, § 5: Mar. 2, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Department of Correction should be encouraged to expand the use of work release programs; and that in order to expand such programs it is necessary to grant the department authority to house inmates outside of Department of Correction units; and that this act is immediately necessary to grant such authority. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 814, § 3: Mar. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Department of Correction should be encouraged to expand the use of work release programs; and that in order to expand such programs it is necessary to grant the department authority to house inmates outside of Department of Correction units; and that this act is immediately necessary to grant such authority. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 953, § 31: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1991, No. 287, § 5: Feb. 28, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is urgent need for additional space to house inmates of the Department of Correction who are participating in the prerelease and work-release programs of the Department; that the Benton Services Center facilities are suitable for housing such inmates in excess of the number currently authorized by law; that this Act is designed to permit the housing of additional inmates at the Benton Services Center facility and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1112, § 5: Apr. 9, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that facilities of the Department of Correction are inadequate to house all inmates committed to the custody of the Department of Correction; that it is urgent that the Board of Correction be given authority to take appropriate steps to provide for housing of inmates in facilities other than Department facilities; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, Nos. 532 and 550, § 13: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the sentencing policies and standards of the State of Arkansas are in need of immediate reform in order to better provide for a balanced correctional system and to better effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crimes and to make possible their return as useful members of the community and passage of this act is necessary to facilitate these reforms. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect, unless provided for otherwise herein, from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2017, No. 444, § 2: Mar. 9, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 309 inmates are currently a valuable resource for local jails and political subdivisions; that Act 309 inmates should be available for use by local nonprofit organizations; and that this act is immediately necessary because a number of nonprofit entities can immediately benefit from the assistance of Act 309 inmates. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

ALR.

Computation of incarceration time under work release or hardship sentences. 28 A.L.R.4th 1265.

Arkansas' work release statutes and regulations do not create a protectible liberty interest in participation in work release programs. Mahfouz v. Lockhart, 826 F.2d 791 (8th Cir. 1987).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” and made a similar change in (a) and (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (b).

Although the Arkansas legislature's labeling of an Act 814 participant (a work-release participant pursuant to Acts 1983, No. 814, codified as this subchapter) as an “inmate” is not determinative, it does make it reasonable for the Department of Corrections Director, absent authoritative direction to the contrary, to believe that Act 814 status may be more akin to inmate status (deserving of a prison disciplinary hearing before revocation) than to parolee status (deserving of certain other protections before revocation). Jackson v. Lockhart, 7 F.3d 1391 (8th Cir. 1993).

Status in a work-release program is similar to that of parole, and, therefore, the due process clause vests the prisoner with a liberty interest in remaining in the program; accordingly the prisoner is entitled to due process protection for that interest. Edwards v. Lockhart, 908 F.2d 299 (8th Cir. 1990).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §12-30-402, concerning establishment of new work-release centers, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 648, § 18.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted the (a) and (b) designations; and in (a) substituted “Community Correction Revolving Fund” for “Community Service Revolving Fund [abolished],” and “may” for “is authorized to.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a).

Cross References. Budget Stabilization Trust Fund, §19-5-501.

Community Correction Revolving Fund, §19-6-432.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 30, § 22; Pope's Dig., § 12667; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-219; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3376.

12-30-305. Sales by director.

The Director of the Division of Correction, by and with the consent and approval of the Board of Corrections, shall make all sales of commodities and articles produced and offered for sale by the various penal institutions under his or her supervision.

The director shall keep a complete and detailed record of all sales and shall immediately deposit all moneys received therefrom with the Treasurer of State to the credit of the Penal Institution Fund.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 30, § 35; Pope's Dig., § 12702; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-222; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 825.

12-30-306. Purchases, expenditures, and sales — Compliance with laws.

All purchases for or in behalf of the Division of Correction and its various institutions shall be in strict compliance with the state purchasing laws and applicable rules promulgated thereunder.

All expenditures of funds appropriated for the division shall be in accordance with the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, §19-4-101 et seq., and other applicable fiscal laws of this state governing expenditure of state funds.

All sales of farm products, livestock, or other products produced in connection with the agriculture and livestock activities at the respective institutions of the division shall be in accordance with the applicable laws of this state governing the advertising for bids and awarding of contracts for the sales.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-220.1; Acts 2019, No. 315, §
910; 2019, No. 910, § 826.

12-30-307. Payment for food used by division.

The Division of Correction may make payment from the Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account to the Division of Correction Farm Fund in an amount not to exceed fifty cents (50¢) on each dollar's worth of food produced on the division farm for consumption in the Inmate Care and Custody Program.

The division shall keep appropriate records reflecting farm production and the value of farm-produced products utilized in the Inmate Care and Custody Program and shall keep records of current market values in support of any such payments.

In no event shall the amount received under this section, when combined with any loans forgiven under provisions of other laws, exceed the value of the farm products utilized by the Inmate Care and Custody Program.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 953, § 25; 2019, No. 910, § 827.

12-30-308. Lease or rental of land.

The Board of Corrections, in its discretion and with the Governor's approval, may cease or abandon the cultivation of any land now owned by the state and under the jurisdiction of the board and may rent or lease the land not cultivated, or abandoned and not needed in the proper operation of the penal system of this state, if they deem the action expedient.

In its discretion and with the Governor's approval, the board may rent or lease additional lands for the planting and cultivation of crops by inmates.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 30, § 33; Pope's Dig., § 12700; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-217; 2013, No. 294, § 1; 2013, No. 295, § 6; 2013, No. 1277, § 4.

Subchapter 4

— Work-Study Release

12-30-401. Work and rehabilitative programs — Work-release programs.

All inmates committed to the Division of Correction for institutional care shall be required to participate in the various work programs to which assigned and may be afforded vocational training and rehabilitative opportunities in accordance with rules and procedures therefor as promulgated by the Director of the Division of Correction with the approval of the Board of Corrections.

The division may institute “work-release” programs under which the inmates selected to participate in the programs may be gainfully employed or attend school outside of the units maintained by the division, under rules promulgated by the director with the approval of the board.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 9; 1971, No. 465, § 1; 1977, No. 482, § 5; 1981, No. 58, § 2; 1983, No. 309, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-117; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 911; 2019, No. 910, §
828.

12-30-402. Establishment of new work-release centers.

The Community Correction Revolving Fund may borrow from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund for the establishment of new work-release centers for the Division of Correction.

The loans shall be repaid by the end of the fiscal year in which the loans are made.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 953, § 19; 2005, No. 1962, § 50; 2019, No. 910, § 829.

12-30-403. Rules generally.

The Board of Corrections and the Director of the Division of Correction will govern the administration of work-release programs with the promulgation of rules and procedures subject to the continuing review by the Governor, who shall have the right to revise and rescind any such rules and procedures.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 9; 1971, No. 465, § 1; 1977, No. 482, § 5; 1981, No. 58, § 2; 1983, No. 440, § 1; 1983, No. 814, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-117; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 912.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and made similar changes in the text.

12-30-404. Inmates excepted from program.

No person shall be allowed to participate in any work-release program conducted by or for the Division of Correction if convicted of:

A capital offense;

Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;

Rape, § 5-14-103;

Kidnapping, § 5-11-102; or

Aggravated robbery a second or subsequent time, § 5-12-103.

However, this section shall not apply to persons participating in work-release programs on July 20, 1979.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in the introductory language of (a).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 399, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-117.1; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 830.

12-30-405. Contracts for inmate labor.

The Division of Correction may make contractual arrangements for use of inmate labor by the following prioritized list:

Other state departments, divisions, and agencies;

Counties, cities, and school districts; and

Civic organizations, other nonprofit organizations, and private citizens, including, but not limited to, those responsible for the preservation of natural resources or other public works.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in the introductory language; and inserted “divisions” in (1).

Cross References. Road work by inmates, §27-66-601.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 9; 1971, No. 465, § 1; 1977, No. 482, § 5; 1981, No. 58, § 2; 1983, No. 309, § 1; 1983, No. 440, § 1; 1983, No. 814, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-117; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 831.

12-30-406. Allocation of earnings — Inmate's funds.

Under any work-release program, earnings by the inmate shall be paid directly to the Division of Correction and applied as follows:

The division shall retain an amount to be established by the Director of the Division of Correction which will reasonably compensate the division for the cost of feeding, housing, and supervising the inmate;

The division shall determine if the inmate has persons dependent upon him or her for their support and may remit to such persons that portion of the earnings which the director considers reasonable;

The division shall determine if the inmate has created victims of his or her criminal conduct who are entitled to restitution or reparations for physical injury or loss of or damage to property and may remit to the victim that portion of the earnings which the director considers reasonable.

However, in no case shall the portion of the earnings remitted for restitution be in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of the inmate's income remaining after deduction for the cost of care, custody, and family support provided for in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section.

The names and addresses of victims and the amount of restitution to be paid shall be provided to the director by certificate of the trial court in which the inmate was convicted; and

The balance shall be deposited to the account of the inmate.

Inmates may be required to contribute to the support of their dependents who may be receiving public assistance during the period of their commitment if funds credited to them are adequate for that purpose provided that all inmates participating in the work-study release programs shall continue to be housed at a division institution.

The division shall promulgate rules governing the possession of or use of money by inmates and may prohibit the possession of money by inmates and may establish a system for the custody of all funds belonging to inmates, for the balance of such fund period.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

Cross References. Cash in possession of inmate; confiscation, §12-29-108.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “prerelease, work-release, and other rehabilitative programs that” for “prerelease and work-release programs of the Department of Correction that” and “a number appropriate to maintain the security and good order of the center” for “two hundred twenty-five (225)”; in (b)(2), substituted “maximum number of persons on prerelease, work-release, and other rehabilitative programs to be” for “maximum of four hundred twenty-five (425) persons on prerelease and work-release programs may be” and added “may be established by the Board of Corrections” at the end.

The 2017 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1)(A); rewrote (a)(1)(B)(ii) and (a)(2); in (a)(3)(A), substituted “a county sheriff, chief of police, or other authorized law enforcement officer of an approved jail facility under this section” for “approved jail facilities” and “that prosecuted” for “who convicted”; substituted “released under this section” for “so released” in (a)(4)(A); substituted “forty-five (45) months” for “thirty (30) months” in the introductory language of (a)(4)(B); and deleted (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and similar language throughout (a).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning meritorious good time, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 503, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 9; 1971, No. 465, § 1; 1977, No. 482, § 5; 1981, No. 58, § 2; 1983, No. 440, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-117.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “inmates of the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction” for “Department of Correction inmates” in (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a).

Protect the inmate's rights to due process;

Provide for hearings as necessary before the Crime Victims Reparations Board; and

Govern the disposition of an inmate's gross monthly wage, minus required payroll deductions and payment of necessary work-related incidental expenses, for the following purposes:

To support the family and dependent relatives of the inmate;

To discharge any legal obligations, including judgments for restitution;

To pay all or a part of the cost of the inmate's board, room, clothing, medical, dental, and other correctional services;

To provide for funds payable to the inmate upon his or her release;

To reimburse the state for the actual value of state property intentionally or willfully and wantonly destroyed by the inmate during his or her incarceration;

To reimburse the state for reasonable costs incurred in returning the inmate to the facility to which he or she was incarcerated in the event of escape; and

To deposit an appropriate amount into the Crime Victims Reparations Revolving Fund.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading; in (a), substituted “An inmate of” for “A person committed to”, inserted “or Department of Community Correction”, substituted “under” for “pursuant to”, inserted “in a separate wage fund”, and substituted “in which the inmate is incarcerated” for “in a separate wage fund” at the end; in the introductory language of (b), inserted “and the Director of the Department of Community Correction” and substituted “rules that” for “regulations which will”; substituted “an inmate’s” for “a confined person’s” in the introductory language of (b)(3); in (b)(3)(A), substituted “To support the family” for “The support of families” and made similar changes in (b)(3)(B), (E), (F), and (G); substituted “incarceration” for “commitment” in (b)(3)(E); and substituted “was incarcerated” for “is committed” in (b)(3)(F).

Cross References. Crime Victims Reparations Revolving Fund, §19-5-950.

Publisher's Notes. Former chapter 31, concerning the Corrections Resources Commission, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 51. The former chapter was derived from the following sources:

12-31-101. Acts 1991, No. 568, § 1; 1991, No. 1169, § 1.

12-31-102. Acts 1991, No. 568, § 1; 1991, No. 1169, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 72.

12-31-103. Acts 1991, No. 568, § 2; 1991, No. 1169, § 2.

12-31-104. Acts 1991, No. 568, § 3; 1991, No. 1169, § 3.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 9; 1971, No. 465, § 1; 1977, No. 482, § 5; 1981, No. 58, § 2; 1983, No. 309, § 1; 1983, No. 440, § 1; 1983, No. 814, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-117; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 913.

12-30-407. Housing of participants.

(1)(A)The Board of Corrections may promulgate rules to allow the proper classification of inmates to be released to the county sheriffs of approved jail facilities or chiefs of police or other authorized law enforcement officers of city-operated approved jail facilities or community correction centers outside the Division of Correction.

(i)Inmates shall be interviewed to develop a classification of each inmate's skills, work experiences, job background, and education.

Inmates shall work at jobs under this section that directly benefit approved jail facilities or a political subdivision, or may assist a political subdivision in supporting or working with a nonprofit organization with a chapter, committee, or other governing body that is based in the county, that are related to a particular inmate's background classification, and in which the inmates are under supervision at all times.

(A)(i)County sheriffs, chiefs of police, or other authorized law enforcement officers of approved jail facilities may request assignment of inmates to their approved jail facilities to perform particular jobs for the approved jail facilities or for a political subdivision, or to assist a political subdivision in supporting or working with a nonprofit organization with a chapter, committee, or other governing body that is based in the county, when the jobs or assistance are in a particular area of need of the approved jail facilities, political subdivision, or nonprofit organization with a chapter, committee, or other governing body that is based in the county.

The division shall review the requests and shall submit a list of inmates with appropriate skills or backgrounds for the particular job needs of the approved jail facility, political subdivision, or nonprofit organization with a chapter, committee, or other governing body that is based in the county that is being provided assistance by a political subdivision, in accordance with the division's classification of inmates' skills and backgrounds.

County sheriffs, chiefs of police, or other authorized law enforcement officers shall choose inmates from the submitted list who are appropriate for the needs of the approved jail facilities, political subdivision, or nonprofit organization with a chapter, committee, or other governing body that is based in the county that is being provided assistance by a political subdivision.

County sheriffs, chiefs of police, or other authorized law enforcement officers of approved jail facilities shall not request the assignment of a particular inmate to an approved jail facility, political subdivision, or nonprofit organization with a chapter, committee, or other governing body that is based in the county, and may refuse the assignment of a particular inmate.

(A)An inmate shall not be released to a county sheriff, chief of police, or other authorized law enforcement officer of an approved jail facility under this section until notification of the release is first sent to the county sheriff of the county from which the inmate was tried and convicted, the prosecuting attorney's office that prosecuted the inmate, and, upon a written request, to the victim or victim's family.

Notification of the victim or victim's family shall be done by mail to the last known address supplied to the division in accordance with division policies.

(A)Inmates released under this section shall be entitled to credit on their sentences under the meritorious classification system of the division.

However, no inmate shall be eligible to be released to the county sheriff, chief of police, or other authorized law enforcement officer of an approved jail facility unless the inmate is within forty-five (45) months of his or her first parole eligibility date or his or her first post prison transfer eligibility date, unless:

The inmate is returning to the county from which he or she was tried and convicted and the victim or victim's immediate family, if residing in the county from which the inmate was tried and convicted, has been notified of the inmate's return; or

(a)If the inmate is released to a county other than a county from which he or she was tried and convicted, the county sheriff of the county from which he or she was tried and convicted shall be notified as provided in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section.

(1)Unless the county sheriff responds within fifteen (15) days of notification that he or she disapproves of the transfer, the inmate may be transferred as provided in this section.

If the county sheriff disapproves of the transfer and an inmate becomes eligible to be released again, the notifications required by subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall be made again.

(1)The number of persons on prerelease, work-release, and other rehabilitative programs that may be housed at the Arkansas Health Center shall not exceed a number appropriate to maintain the security and good order of the center.

However, with the approval of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Administrator of the Arkansas Health Center, a maximum number of persons on prerelease, work-release, and other rehabilitative programs to be housed at the center may be established by the Board of Corrections.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 9; 1971, No. 465, § 1; 1977, No. 482, § 5; 1977, No. 948, § 20; 1981, No. 58, § 2; 1983, No. 309, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 440, § 1; 1983, No. 814, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-117, 46-117.2, 46-117.3; Acts 1991, No. 287, § 1; 1991, No. 1112, § 1; 1993, No. 532, § 8; 1993, No. 550, § 8; 1995, No. 1188, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 115, § 1; 1997, No. 936, § 1; 1997, No. 1271, § 1; 2001, No. 152, § 1; 2001, No. 1402, § 1; 2011, No. 183, § 1; 2017, No. 444, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 832-835.

12-30-408. [Repealed.]

12-30-501. Private sector prison industry enhancement programs.

The Board of Corrections may contract with any private individual, corporation, partnership, or association whereby inmates would assemble, process, fabricate, or repair parts or components for goods or products being manufactured or produced by the private individual or entity.

All contracts executed under this section must comply with federal law and must not result in any significant displacement of employed workers in the private sector.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 106, § 1.

12-30-502. Transportation and sale of goods.

Goods produced in whole or in part by inmates of the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction participating in private sector prison industry enhancement programs may be transported and sold in the same manner as goods produced by free persons, provided that the inmates participating in the private sector prison industry enhancement programs are paid at least the minimum wage prescribed by state law.

The minimum wage requirement does not apply to hobby and craft items produced by the inmates on their own time and with their own resources or to inmates working in any other prison industries program.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 106, § 1; 2015, No. 144, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 836.

12-30-503. Purpose of wages set aside — Rules of director.

An inmate of the Department of Correction or Department of Community Correction who is earning at least minimum wage and is employed under §§12-30-501 and12-30-502 shall have his or her wages set aside in a separate wage fund by the warden or supervisor of the facility in which the inmate is incarcerated.

The Director of the Department of Correction and the Director of the Department of Community Correction shall promulgate rules that:

History.

Acts 1995, No. 106, § 1; 2015, No. 144, § 2.

12-30-209. Order of distribution.

12-30-303. Cooperation of Cooperative Extension Service.

Subchapter 5

— Privatized Prison-Made Goods